Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. ORGANIZATION OF MUNICIPAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE A. TYPES OF MUNICIPALITIES

CHAPTER 7. TYPE B GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY

Sec. 7.001. AUTHORITY TO INCORPORATE AS TYPE B GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY. A community may incorporate under this chapter as a Type B general-law municipality if it:

(1) constitutes an unincorporated town or village;

(2) contains 201 to 9,999 inhabitants; and

(3) meets the territorial requirements prescribed by Section 5.901.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 7.002. APPLICATION TO INCORPORATE. (a) The residents of a community may initiate an attempt to incorporate the community under this chapter by filing with the county judge of the county in which the community is located an application to incorporate signed by at least 50 qualified voters who are residents of the community.

(b) The application must state the proposed boundaries and name of the municipality, and it must be accompanied by a plat of the proposed municipality that contains only the territory to be used strictly for municipal purposes.

(c) If a community is located in two counties, the application to incorporate may be filed with the county judge of either county.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 65, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 7.003. ELECTION ORDER. If satisfactory proof is made that a community that has filed an application to incorporate under this chapter contains the requisite number of inhabitants, the county judge shall order an incorporation election to be held on a specified date and at a designated place in the community.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 7.004. ELECTION OFFICERS. The county judge shall appoint an officer to preside at an incorporation election under this chapter. The presiding officer shall appoint two election judges and two election clerks to assist in conducting the election.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 7.005. NOTICE OF ELECTION. An incorporation election under this chapter may not be held until notice of the election has been posted at three public places in the community for the 10 days preceding the date of the election.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 7.006. QUALIFIED VOTERS. Each qualified voter who resides within the boundaries of the proposed municipality may vote at the election.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 7.007. ORDER OF INCORPORATION. (a) Within 20 days after the date the county judge receives the returns of an incorporation election, the judge shall, if a majority of the votes cast are for incorporation, make an entry in the records of the commissioners court that the community is incorporated. The judge shall include the boundaries of the municipality in the entry. The incorporation of the community as a municipality is effective on the date the entry is made.

(b) A certified copy of the entry and a plat of the municipality shall be recorded in the deed records of the county in which the municipality is located.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 7.008. INTERVAL BETWEEN ELECTIONS. A county judge may not order an incorporation election under this chapter to be held earlier than three years after the date of the most recent incorporation election under this chapter.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 792, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.